District of Columbia statutes.
3-1333

Forged, counterfeit or altered tickets.

No person shall: Forge or counterfeit any ticket made for the purposes of any lottery or daily numbers games; alter any number imprinted on such a ticket; offer for sale or sell any such forged, counterfeited, or altered ticket, knowing it to be such; or present any such forged, counterfeited, or altered ticket to any person engaged in carrying out this chapter; with the intent to defraud the District of Columbia or any person participating in any such lottery or daily numbers games. Any person convicted of violating this section shall be subject to a fine not to exceed $5,000 or imprisonment not to exceed 1 year or both. Civil fines, penalties, and fees may be imposed as alternative sanctions for any infraction of the provisions of this section, or any rules or regulations issued under the authority of this section, pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2. Adjudication of any infraction of this section shall be pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2.

Mar. 10, 1981, D.C. Law 3-172, § 4, 27 DCR 4736
Oct. 5, 1985, D.C. Law 6-42, § 406(b), 32 DCR 4450

History

1981 Ed., § 2-2533.

Prior Codifications